src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON NUM_YKSI  !!≈ @CODE@ yksi:y
!+Num+Card: NMN_YKSI ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ksi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@h00 NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@htet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@hte%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ; !!≈ * @CODE@ This cannot be final


LEXICON NUM_KAKSI  !!≈ @CODE@ kaksi:ka
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ksi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@h00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@htet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@hte%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ This cannot be final
 
LEXICON NUM_SEIČČIE  !!≈ @CODE@ seiččie:seičče
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>e0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^WGStemn0 NUM-SG-PAR_dy ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@met NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@mä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_NELLI !!≈ @CODE@ nelli:nell
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@i00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>i0 NUM-SG-PAR_ä ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>ä NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aä%}0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aä%}0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>%{aä%}t NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii0 NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@ä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKSA !!≈ @CODE@ kaheksa:kaheksa
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a00 NUM-SG-PAR_a2 ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@at0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>oi NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>oi NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>oi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>oi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>oi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@ ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_YHEKSÄ !!≈ @CODE@ yheksä:yheksä
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ä00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ä00 NUM-SG-PAR_a2 ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ä00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ä00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ät00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@ ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT !!≈ @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
:%{back%} NUM_TUHAT_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_TUHAT_01 !!≈ @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@nde ORD_01_BACK ;

!LEXICON NUM_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ 
!+Qnt:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUZI !!≈ @CODE@ kuuzi:kuud
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^D2Z%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@e%^WGStemt NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@e%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ;
