src/fst/morphology/stems/quantifiers.lexc
kaksi:ka NUM_KAKSI  "kaksi" ;
kaheksa:kaheks NUM_KAHEKSA  "" ;
kuuzi:kuud NUM_KUUZI  "" ;
nelli:nell%{front%} NUM_NELLI  "" ;
seiččie:seičče NUM_SEIČČIE  "seitsemän" ;
tuhat:tuha NUM_TUHAT  "" ;
yheksä:yheks NUM_YHEKSÄ  "" ;
yksi:y NUM_YKSI  "" ;
